st.aff
FLAG long
SFX iJ Y 43
SFX iJ dormir dormir/ dormir # po:infi
SFX iJ dormir dormant/ dormir # po:ppre
SFX iJ dormir dormi/ dormir # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX iJ dormir dormis/ dormir # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX iJ dormir dormie/ dormir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iJ dormir dormies/ dormir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iJ dormir dors/ dormir # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dort/ dormir # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormons/ dormir # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormez/ dormir # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dorment/ dormir # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX iJ dormir dormais/ dormir # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormait/ dormir # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormions/ dormir # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormiez/ dormir # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormaient/ dormir # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX iJ dormir dormis/ dormir # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormit/ dormir # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormîmes/ dormir # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormîtes/ dormir # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormirent/ dormir # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX iJ dormir dormirai/ dormir # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX iJ dormir dormiras/ dormir # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormira/ dormir # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormirons/ dormir # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormirez/ dormir # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormiront/ dormir # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX iJ dormir dormirais/ dormir # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormirait/ dormir # po:cond po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormirions/ dormir # po:cond po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormiriez/ dormir # po:cond po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormiraient/ dormir # po:cond po:3pl
SFX iJ dormir dorme/ dormir # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormes/ dormir # po:spre po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormisse/ dormir # po:simp po:1sg
SFX iJ dormir dormisses/ dormir # po:simp po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormît/ dormir # po:simp po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormissions/ dormir # po:simp po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormissiez/ dormir # po:simp po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormissent/ dormir # po:simp po:3pl
SFX iJ dormir dors/ dormir # po:impe po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormons/ dormir # po:impe po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormez/ dormir # po:impe po:2pl

SFX iK Y 42
SFX iK quérir quérir/ quérir # po:infi
SFX iK quérir quérant/ quérir # po:ppre
SFX iK quérir quis/ quérir # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX iK quérir quise/ quérir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iK quérir quises/ quérir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iK quérir quiers/ quérir # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iK quérir quiert/ quérir # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX iK quérir quérons/ quérir # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX iK quérir quérez/ quérir # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX iK quérir quièrent/ quérir # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX iK quérir quérais/ quérir # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iK quérir quérait/ quérir # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX iK quérir quérions/ quérir # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX iK quérir quériez/ quérir # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX iK quérir quéraient/ quérir # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX iK quérir quis/ quérir # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iK quérir quit/ quérir # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX iK quérir quîmes/ quérir # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX iK quérir quîtes/ quérir # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX iK quérir quirent/ quérir # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX iK quérir querrai/ quérir # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX iK quérir querras/ quérir # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX iK quérir querra/ quérir # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX iK quérir querrons/ quérir # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX iK quérir querrez/ quérir # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX iK quérir querront/ quérir # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX iK quérir querrais/ quérir # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iK quérir querrait/ quérir # po:cond po:3sg
SFX iK quérir querrions/ quérir # po:cond po:1pl
SFX iK quérir querriez/ quérir # po:cond po:2pl
SFX iK quérir querraient/ quérir # po:cond po:3pl
SFX iK quérir quière/ quérir # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX iK quérir quières/ quérir # po:spre po:2sg
SFX iK quérir quisse/ quérir # po:simp po:1sg
SFX iK quérir quisses/ quérir # po:simp po:2sg
SFX iK quérir quît/ quérir # po:simp po:3sg
SFX iK quérir quissions/ quérir # po:simp po:1pl
SFX iK quérir quissiez/ quérir # po:simp po:2pl
SFX iK quérir quissent/ quérir # po:simp po:3pl
SFX iK quérir quiers/ quérir # po:impe po:2sg
SFX iK quérir quérons/ quérir # po:impe po:1pl
SFX iK quérir quérez/ quérir # po:impe po:2pl

SFX iM Y 42
SFX iM quérir quérir/ quérir # po:infi
SFX iM quérir quérant/ quérir # po:ppre
SFX iM quérir quis/ quérir # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX iM quérir quise/ quérir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iM quérir quises/ quérir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iM quérir quiers/ quérir # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iM quérir quiert/ quérir # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX iM quérir quérons/ quérir # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX iM quérir quérez/ quérir # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX iM quérir quièrent/ quérir # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX iM quérir quérais/ quérir # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iM quérir quérait/ quérir # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX iM quérir quérions/ quérir # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX iM quérir quériez/ quérir # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX iM quérir quéraient/ quérir # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX iM quérir quis/ quérir # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iM quérir quit/ quérir # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX iM quérir quîmes/ quérir # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX iM quérir quîtes/ quérir # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX iM quérir quirent/ quérir # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX iM quérir querrai/ quérir # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX iM quérir querras/ quérir # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX iM quérir querra/ quérir # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX iM quérir querrons/ quérir # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX iM quérir querrez/ quérir # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX iM quérir querront/ quérir # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX iM quérir querrais/ quérir # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iM quérir querrait/ quérir # po:cond po:3sg
SFX iM quérir querrions/ quérir # po:cond po:1pl
SFX iM quérir querriez/ quérir # po:cond po:2pl
SFX iM quérir querraient/ quérir # po:cond po:3pl
SFX iM quérir quière/ quérir # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX iM quérir quières/ quérir # po:spre po:2sg
SFX iM quérir quisse/ quérir # po:simp po:1sg
SFX iM quérir quisses/ quérir # po:simp po:2sg
SFX iM quérir quît/ quérir # po:simp po:3sg
SFX iM quérir quissions/ quérir # po:simp po:1pl
SFX iM quérir quissiez/ quérir # po:simp po:2pl
SFX iM quérir quissent/ quérir # po:simp po:3pl
SFX iM quérir quiers/ quérir # po:impe po:2sg
SFX iM quérir quérons/ quérir # po:impe po:1pl
SFX iM quérir quérez/ quérir # po:impe po:2pl
