st.dic
acquérir/iK  # po:v3__t_q__a
conquérir/iK  # po:v3_it_q__a
endormir/iJ  # po:v3_it_q__a
enquérir/iM  # po:v3____p_e_
réacquérir/iK  # po:v3__t____a
reconquérir/iK  # po:v3_it_q__a
rendormir/iJ  # po:v3__t_q__a
requérir/iK  # po:v3__t____a
